Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
76-3217
Violations; disciplinary hearings;
notice; procedure.

(1) The board shall conduct disciplinary hearings for any
violation of the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(2) Before
the board may censure, suspend, or revoke the registration of, or levy a fine
or civil penalty against, a registered appraisal management company, the board
shall notify the company in writing of any charges made under the Nebraska
Appraisal Management Company Registration Act at least twenty days prior to
the date set for the hearing and shall permit the appraisal management company
an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. The notice shall be satisfied
by personal service on the controlling person of the company or agent for
service of process in this state or by sending the notice by certified mail,
return receipt requested, to the address of the controlling person of the
company that is on file with the board.

(3) Any hearing pursuant to this section
shall be heard by a hearing officer at a time and place prescribed by the
board. The hearing officer may make findings of fact and shall deliver such
findings to the board. The board shall take such disciplinary action as it
deems appropriate, subject to the limitations contained within section 76-3216.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 17.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.